apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="dø__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ikke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikke</l>      <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikker</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkes</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkende</l>   <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/æde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æd</l>        <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æde</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æder</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædes</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædende</l>    <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="støt/te__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tede</l>      <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tet</l>       <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tende</l>     <r>te<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tv/inge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ing</l>       <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inge</l>      <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inger</l>     <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inges</l>     <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ingende</l>   <r>inge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="s/ynge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yng</l>       <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynge</l>      <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynger</l>     <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ynges</l>     <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungtes</l>    <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unget</l>     <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngende</l>   <r>ynge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sov/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="udtryk/ke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ke</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ker</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kes</l>       <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kende</l>     <r>ke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="r/yge__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yg</l>        <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yge</l>       <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yger</l>      <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yges</l>      <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øg</l>        <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øget</l>      <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ygende</l>    <r>yge<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fl/yve__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>yv</l>        <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yve</l>       <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yver</l>      <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yves</l>      <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øj</l>        <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>øjet</l>      <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yvende</l>    <r>yve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="till/ade__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ade</l>       <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ader</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ades</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odes</l>      <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adt</l>       <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>adende</l>    <r>ade<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="led/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afbenytte">       <i>afbenyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="affatte">         <i>affat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afglatte">        <i>afglat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="aflytte">         <i>aflyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afmatte">         <i>afmat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afrette">         <i>afret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afslutte">        <i>afslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anrette">         <i>anret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="babysitte">       <i>babysit</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="benytte">         <i>benyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="berette">         <i>beret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskatte">        <i>beskat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beskytte">        <i>beskyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beslutte">        <i>beslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="besmitte">        <i>besmit</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bespotte">        <i>bespot</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="cutte">           <i>cut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ensrette">        <i>ensret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flytte">          <i>flyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gætte">           <i>gæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="henrette">        <i>henret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indberette">      <i>indberet</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indeslutte">      <i>indeslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="indrette">        <i>indret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knytte">          <i>knyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lytte">           <i>lyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miste">           <i>mis</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mætte">           <i>mæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omfatte">         <i>omfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opfatte">         <i>opfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="oprette">         <i>opret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plette">          <i>plet</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rette">           <i>ret</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sammenfatte">     <i>sammenfat</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slutte">          <i>slut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smutte">          <i>smut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="splitte">         <i>split</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spætte">          <i>spæt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tilslutte">       <i>tilslut</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udnytte">         <i>udnyt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestikke">        <i>best</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drikke">          <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dø">              <i>dø</i><par n="dø__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flyve">           <i>fl</i><par n="fl/yve__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forlade">         <i>forl</i><par n="till/ade__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lyve">            <i>l</i><par n="fl/yve__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lede">            <i>led</i><par n="led/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ryge">            <i>r</i><par n="r/yge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="synge">           <i>s</i><par n="s/ynge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sove">            <i>sov</i><par n="sov/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="springe">         <i>spr</i><par n="tv/inge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stikke">          <i>st</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="støtte">          <i>støt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillade">         <i>till</i><par n="till/ade__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="træde">           <i>tr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="trætte">          <i>træt</i><par n="støt/te__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tvinge">          <i>tv</i><par n="tv/inge__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="udtrykke">        <i>udtryk</i><par n="udtryk/ke__vblex"/></e>
